Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 20 Property Exempt from Execution or Attachment

Cross references. —

As to attachment generally, see chapter 15 of this title.

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see chapter 17 of this title.

As to enforcement of judgments in justice of the peace courts, see §§

1-21-501

to

1-21-603

.

For provision specifying when proceeds of wrongful death judgment may not be used to pay debts of decedent, see §

1-38-102

.

As to homestead rights in connection with administration of estates, see §§

2-6-104

to

2-6-109

.

As to earnings of inmates in work release program not being subject to garnishment, see §

7-16-308

.

As to exemption of fire department pension and retirement benefits, see §

15-5-209

.

As to exemption of pay for performance of military duty, see §

19-9-401

.

As to exemption of separate property of one spouse for debts of the other, see §

20-1-201

.

For provision that married person sued alone may claim benefit of all exemptions for heads of families, see §

20-1-202

.

As to exemption of worker's compensation awards, see §

27-14-702

.

As to release or waiver of homestead rights generally, see §§

34-2-107

and

34-2-121

.

As to exemption of cemetery funds, see §

35-8-103

.

As to restrictions on sale of homestead for delinquent taxes, see §

39-13-108

.

For limitation on garnishment in consumer credit cases, see §

40-14-505

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

9A Am. Jur. 2d Bankruptcy §§ 1298,
1299;
31 Am. Jur. 2d Exemptions §§ 89-197,
199-267,
269-290;
40 Am. Jur. 2d Homestead § 1 et seq.

Retirement or pension proceeds or annuity payments under group insurance as subject to attachment or garnishment, 28 ALR2d 1213.

Endowment policy as life insurance within exemption law, 30 ALR2d 751.

Exemption of proceeds of National Service Life Insurance from claims of creditors, 54 ALR2d 1335.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorney's fees and cost incurred in connection therewith, against homestead exemption, 54 ALR2d 1422.

Wife as head of family within homestead or other property exemption provision, 67 ALR2d 779.

Family allowance from decedent's estate as exempt from attachment, garnishment, execution and foreclosure, 27 ALR3d 863.

Validity, construction, and effect of statutory exemptions of proceeds of workers' compensation awards, 48 ALR5th 473.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

Individual retirement accounts as exempt property in bankruptcy, 133 ALR Fed 1.

40 C.J.S. Homesteads § 1 et seq.

§ 1-20-101.
Homestead
exemption; right and amount.

Every resident of the
state is entitled to a homestead not exceeding twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) in value, exempt from execution and attachment arising
from any debt, contract or civil obligation entered into or incurred.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 432; R.S. 1887, § 2780; R.S. 1899, § 3901; Laws 1909, ch. 102, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4755; Laws 1915, ch. 104, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 6028; R.S. 1931, § 89-2984; C.S. 1945, § 3-4501; Laws 1951, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-498; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-21-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 41, § 1; 2012, ch. 69, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to elective share, see §

2-5-101

et seq.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).”

Waiver requirements include all homestead property, and are not limited to real property.

Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987).

Purchase money security interests given priority. —

Purchase money security interests in personal property, as well as real property, have priority over a debtor's homestead exemption. Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987).

No attachment of nonpurchase-money lien absent waiver. —

A consensual, but nonpurchase money, lien does not attach to the first $10,000 in value of a debtor's homestead unless it is accompanied by an informed, voluntary and specific waiver of the homestead exemption. In re VanGorp, 128 B.R. 579, 1991 Bankr. LEXIS 881 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1991).

Amount of homestead exempted from execution. —

Statutes restricting alienation or encumbrance of homestead refer to premises exempt as such from execution, and within operation of such statutes, the homestead cannot consist of more land than will amount in value to $1,500 (now $10,000). Jones v. Losekamp, 19 Wyo. 83, 114 P. 673,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1911).

Occupancy and not title is essential consideration

in determining whether the head of a family has a homestead. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Occupancy is required. —

The exemption failed under this section where debtor occupied a mobile home on a parcel of land contiguous to the claimed parcels because the debtor must occupy the homestead at the time the bankruptcy case is filed and contiguousness does not equate with occupancy. In re Welty, 217 B.R. 907, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 92 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1998).

It is immaterial in whom legal title is vested

as long as the property is the actual home of the family. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

And immaterial how it becomes vested. —

Since it does not matter in whom the legal title is vested, likewise it does not matter how the legal title becomes vested in the person or persons who may be entitled to receive it. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Homestead right can be acquired upon undivided interest in land.

Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Therefore, it will attach to real estate held by entirety and
occupied as residence. —

Since it must be regarded as the settled law of Wyoming, under the rule of stare decisis, that a homestead right can be acquired upon an undivided interest in land and that it is immaterial in whom the legal title is vested, it necessarily follows that the right of homestead will attach to real estate held by a husband and wife as tenants by the entirety and occupied by them as a residence. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Loss of right where neither landowner nor family head. —

Under this section, a husband who, with his family, lives on wife's land loses his homestead right therein by permitting his wife and family to separate from him, followed by a divorce in her favor, though he continues to occupy the land, since he is neither owner of the land nor head of a family. In re Arp v. Jacobs, 3 Wyo. 489, 27 P. 800,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1891).

Right of exemption in wife's separate property. —

Under §

20-1-202

, a married woman against whom personal judgment was rendered though judgment was also against her husband, is entitled to homestead exemption in her separate property, on which she lived with her husband though she was not head of a family, and as such entitled to the exemption under this section. Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1919).

Conveyed property not within bankruptcy estate. —

Denial of a debtor's homestead exemption claim under 11 U.S.C.S. § 522 was affirmed because property that had been conveyed to her husband prior to her bankruptcy filing was not within the debtor's bankruptcy estate under 11 U.S.C.S. § 541 since Wyo. Const. Art. 19, § 9 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-20-101

do not create a legal or equitable interest in the property sufficient to independently support a bankruptcy exemption, and because neither the debtor nor her husband owned or were entitled to own the claimed homestead property when the debtor filed for bankruptcy protection, Wyo. Stat. Ann. 1-20-102(a) did not allow a homestead exemption for the property. Hart v. Crawford (In re Hart), 332 B.R. 439, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 23595 (D. Wyo. 2005).

Conveyance of homestead property not void as to excess. —

A deed by the owner, without the consent of his or her spouse, conveying property embracing a homestead, but of a value in excess of $4,000 (now $10,000), is not void as to the excess. Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

Transfer of certificate of purchase of homestead property

goes only to question as to proper or necessary party to motion by owner for share of proceeds. Altman v. District Court of Second Judicial Dist., 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1927).

Signature of wife required. —

A mortgage without wife's signature on a partner's homestead for partnership debt and executed by the partnership is void as to the wife. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Determining claim to proceeds. —

Court could determine claim to proceeds of homestead after expiration of term at which sale was confirmed. Altman v. District Court of Second Judicial Dist., 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1927).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Edelman, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1951).

Quoted

in

In re Johnson, 184 B.R. 141, 1995 Bankr. LEXIS 973 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1995); Zubrod v. Duncan (In re Duncan), 329 F.3d 1195, 2003 U.S. App. LEXIS 10711 (10th Cir. 2003).

Stated

in

In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Towne v. Rumsey, 5 Wyo. 11, 35 P. 1025,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1894); Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

, 40 L.R.A. (n.s.) 785 (1912); Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

, 29 A.L.R. 1371 (1923); In re Estate of Hite, 829 P.2d 1173,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1992); In re Welty, 217 B.R. 907, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 92 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1998); Kwiecinski v. Community First Nat'l Bank of Powell, 245 B.R. 672, 2000 Bankr. LEXIS 221 (10th Cir. 2000); Zubrod v. Duncan, , 271 B.R. 196, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 4 (10th Cir. 2002); McManaman v. McManaman, 2002 WY 128, 53 P.3d 103,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2002); Duncan v. Zubrod (In re Duncan), 294 B.R. 339, 2003 Bankr. LEXIS 594 (10th Cir. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For note on homestead exemption in Wyoming, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 81 (1961).

See note, “Wambeke v. Hopkin — A New Lesson in Wyoming Property Rights,” 18 Wyo. L.J. 34 (1963).

See note, “Should Marital Rights Be Protected by Statute?,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 14 (1964).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lien of judgment on excess value of homestead, 41 ALR4th 292.

Forfeiture of homestead based on criminal activity conducted on premises—state cases, 16 ALR5th 855.

§ 1-20-102.
Homestead exemption; when operative.

The homestead is only exempt as provided in W.S.

1-20-101

while occupied as such by the owner or the person entitled thereto, or his or her family.

When two (2) or more persons jointly own and occupy the same residence, each shall be entitled to the homestead exemption.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 433; R.S. 1887, § 2781; R.S. 1899, § 3902; Laws 1909, ch. 102, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 4756; Laws 1915, ch. 104, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 6029; R.S. 1931, § 89-2985; C.S. 1945, § 3-4502; W.S. 1957, § 1-499; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-21-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 41, § 1.

In general. —

Decedent's homestead is exempt from creditor's claims only while occupied by claimant or his or her family. Dobler v. Clark, 42 Wyo. 160, 292 P. 246,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1925).

Occupied. —

Although the debtors' “farmstead” took up only two acres of the twenty-acre tract, the court was satisfied that they “occupied” the other eighteen within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section, and there is no reason to conclude that they did not “occupy” the remaining sixty acres in the same sense. Kwiecinski v. Community First Nat'l Bank of Powell (In re Kwiecinski), 245 B.R. 672, 2000 Bankr. LEXIS 221 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2000).

Exemption of unoccupied lands cannot be claimed

long after sale of the premises under a mortgage foreclosure, as against grantees. Harney v. Montgomery, 29 Wyo. 362, 213 P. 378,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1923).

Disposition on divorce. —

There being no specific statutory provisions for the disposition of a homestead on divorce, the provisions of §

20-2-114

authorizing court to make just and equitable disposition of the property of parties, control. Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1923).

Validity of tax sale. —

Where plaintiff relied on tax deed in an action to quiet title, it was not sufficient to prove validity of the tax sale. Davis v. Minnesota Baptist Convention, 45 Wyo. 148, 16 P.2d 48,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1932).

Exemption held valid. —

Where debtor occupied his townhouse on the date the bankruptcy petition was filed, his claim of a homestead exemption under Wyoming law was valid. In re Johnson, 184 B.R. 141, 1995 Bankr. LEXIS 973 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1995).

Ownership interest required. —

The spouse of a Chapter 7 debtor was not entitled to claim a homestead exemption in property in which she resided, but had no ownership interest, on the date on which a bankruptcy case was filed; under Wyoming law, an ownership interest was a prerequisite to a claim of homestead exemption, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-20-102(b). Duncan v. Zubrod (In re Duncan), 294 B.R. 339, 2003 Bankr. LEXIS 594 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2003).

Denial of a debtor's homestead exemption claim under 11 U.S.C.S. § 522 was affirmed because property that had been conveyed to her husband prior to her bankruptcy filing was not within the debtor's bankruptcy estate under 11 U.S.C.S. § 541 since Wyo. Const. Art. 19, § 9 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-20-101

do not create a legal or equitable interest in the property sufficient to independently support a bankruptcy exemption, and because neither the debtor nor her husband owned or were entitled to own the claimed homestead property when the debtor filed for bankruptcy protection, Wyo. Stat. Ann. 1-20-102(a) did not allow a homestead exemption for the property. Hart v. Crawford (In re Hart), 332 B.R. 439, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 23595 (D. Wyo. 2005).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Edelman, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1951).

Quoted

in

Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987); Zubrod v. Duncan (In re Duncan), 329 F.3d 1195, 2003 U.S. App. LEXIS 10711 (10th Cir. 2003).

Cited

in

Towne v. Rumsey, 5 Wyo. 11, 35 P. 1025,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1894); Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1919); Harney v. Montgomery, 29 Wyo. 362, 213 P. 378,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1923); Zubrod v. Duncan, , 271 B.R. 196, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 4 (10th Cir. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Separation agreement as affecting right to homestead, 34 ALR2d 1020, 34 ALR2d 1039.

Estate or interest in real property to which homestead claim may attach, 74 ALR2d 1355.

Divorce as affecting homestead, 84 ALR2d 703.

Validity of contract waiving homestead exemption, 94 ALR2d 967.

§ 1-20-103.
Homestead exemption; right of family survivors.

When any person dies
seized of a homestead leaving as survivor a widow, husband or minor
children, the survivor is entitled to the homestead. If there is no
such survivor, the homestead is liable for the debts of the deceased.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 434; R.S. 1887, § 2782; R.S. 1899, § 3903; C.S. 1910, § 4757; C.S. 1920, § 6030; R.S. 1931, § 89-2986; C.S. 1945, § 3-4503; W.S. 1957, § 1-500; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-21-103

.

Right of widow to homestead. —

Dower being abolished, the only substantial interest a wife has in the husband's real estate is the right of homestead. Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1923).

This section contemplates that, to be entitled to the homestead, widow must have been a member of the family of deceased at time of his death and an occupant of the homestead. Ullman v. Abbott, 10 Wyo. 97, 67 P. 467,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1902).

Widow as proper party. —

Widow occupying mortgaged premises and claiming them as homestead in her individual, rather than representative, capacity is a proper party defendant in an ejectment action. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Probate Code does not contemplate homestead different from
exemption laws. —

That §

2-7-504

does not contemplate a probate homestead different from the homestead contemplated under the exemption laws is apparent in a couple of ways. First, it is not primarily a “homestead” as such which the statute authorizes to be set over; it is all property of the decedent “exempt from execution,” including the homestead. Second, the value of the homestead referred to in §

2-7-504

is not fixed in the Probate Code; it is fixed in the exemption laws by §

1-20-101

.Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Hence probate judge looks to exemption laws to determine property
set over. —

A probate judge necessarily turns to the exemption laws to find what, if any, property is to be set over pursuant to the provisions of §

2-7-504

and to find the value thereof when money or other property is set over in lieu of exempt property. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

When land cannot be set apart, law makes other provision for
survivors. —

Ordinarily, where in the nature of things land cannot be set apart as a homestead to the survivors, then the law will make provision for them in lieu thereof. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Homestead right may be abandoned.

Goodson v. Smith, 69 Wyo. 439, 243 P.2d 163,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1952).

Loss of homestead. —

A husband who, with his family lived on wife's land, lost his homestead right therein by permitting his wife and family to separate from him, followed by divorce in her favor, though he continued to occupy the land, since he was neither owner of the land nor head of a family. In re Arp v. Jacobs, 3 Wyo. 489, 27 P. 800,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1925). See §

1-20-101

.

No loss of right by wife's death. —

One who has acquired homestead does not lose his right to the exemption by death of his wife, even though childless, if he continues to occupy premises as a home. Towne v. Rumsey, 5 Wyo. 11, 35 P. 1025,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1894). See §

1-20-102

.

Funeral and administration expenses. —

District court's order setting apart to widow of decedent real property of estate “free from any and all obligations or debts owing by said estate” is erroneous in view of §

2-7-504

where funeral and administration expenses remain unpaid without other property being available from which to pay it. Dobler v. Clark, 42 Wyo. 160, 292 P. 246,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1925).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Edelman, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1951).

Cited

in

Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1919).

§ 1-20-104.
Homestead
exemption; composition.

The homestead may consist
of a house on a lot or lots or other lands of any number of acres,
or a house trailer or other movable home on a lot or lots, whether
or not the house trailer or other movable home is equipped with wheels
or resting upon immovable support.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 435; R.S. 1887, § 2783; R.S. 1899, § 3904; C.S. 1910, § 4758; Laws 1915, ch. 104, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 6031; Laws 1925, ch. 17, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-2987; C.S. 1945, § 3-4504; Laws 1955, ch. 33, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-501; Laws 1963, ch. 163, § 1; 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-21-104; 2012, ch. 69, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “on a lot or lots or other lands” for “and lot or lots in any town or city, or a farm consisting,” inserting “on a lot or lots” and “the house trailer or other movable home is,” and deleted “the value of which does not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000.00)” at the end.

Occupancy is required. —

The exemption failed under this section where debtor occupied a mobile home on a parcel of land contiguous to the claimed parcels because the debtor must occupy the homestead at the time the bankruptcy case is filed and contiguousness does not equate with occupancy. In re Welty, 217 B.R. 907, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 92 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1998).

Conveyance of homestead property not void as to excess. —

A deed by the owner, without the consent of his or her spouse, conveying property embracing a homestead, but of a value in excess of $4,000.00 (now ($10,000), is not void as to the excess. Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Edelman, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1951).

Quoted

in

Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987); Kwiecinski v. Community First Nat'l Bank of Powell, 245 B.R. 672, 2000 Bankr. LEXIS 221 (10th Cir. 2000).

Cited

in

Altman v. District Court, 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(1927).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison With the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Homestead exemption as extending to rentals derived from homestead property, 40 ALR2d 897.

Estate or interest in real property to which a homestead claim may attach, 74 ALR2d 1355.

§ 1-20-105.
Wearing
apparel.

The necessary wearing
apparel of every person not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000.00)
in value, determined in the manner provided in W.S.

1-20-106

is exempt from levy or sale upon execution, writ of attachment
or any process issuing out of any court in this state. Necessary wearing
apparel shall not include jewelry of any type other than wedding rings.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 439; R.S. 1887, § 2787; R.S. 1899, § 3907; C.S. 1910, § 4761; C.S. 1920, § 6034; R.S. 1931, § 89-2990; C.S. 1945, § 3-4507; W.S. 1957, § 1-504; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-21-105; Laws 1983, ch. 41, § 1; 2012, ch. 69, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “two thousand dollars ($2,000.00)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).”

Bankruptcy exemptions. —

Wedding rings inherited by an unmarried debtor that did not signify the debtor's own marriage but were worn for sentimental or ornamental purposes, were not “necessary wearing apparel” and not exempt in bankruptcy under Wyoming law. Zubrod v. Winters, 2002 WY 29, 40 P.3d 1231,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

In re Arp v. Jacobs, 3 Wyo. 489, 27 P. 800,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1925); In re Tidball, 40 F.2d 560, 1930 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2049 (D. Wyo. 1930).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison With the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-20-106.
Exemption
of other personal property; personalty used in livelihood; appraisement.

The following property, when owned by any person, is exempt from levy or sale upon execution, writ of attachment or any process issuing out of any court in this state and shall continue to be exempt while the person or the family of the person is moving from one (1) place of residence to another in this state:

The family bible, pictures and school books;

A lot in any cemetery or burial ground;

Furniture, bedding, provisions and other household articles of any kind or character as the debtor may select, not exceeding in all the value of four thousand dollars ($4,000.00). When two (2) or more persons occupy the same residence, each shall be entitled to a separate exemption;

The value in a motor vehicle not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00);

Not more than three (3) firearms not exceeding in all the value of three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) and their associated ammunition not to exceed one thousand (1,000) rounds per firearm.

The tools, team, implements or stock in trade of any person, used and kept for the purpose of carrying on his trade or business, not exceeding in value four thousand dollars ($4,000.00), or the library, instruments and implements of any professional person, not exceeding in value four thousand dollars ($4,000.00), are exempt from levy or sale upon execution, writ of attachment or any process out of any court in this state.

The value of the property selected by any debtor shall be ascertained by the appraisement of three (3) disinterested appraisers, to be selected and summoned by the officer claiming to levy upon, attach or sell the property. The appraisers shall be sworn by the officer to make a true appraisement of the value of the property.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 440, 442; R.S. 1887, §§ 2788, 2790; R.S. 1899, §§ 3907, 3910; C.S. 1910, §§ 4762, 4764; Laws 1909, ch. 102, § 3; 1911, ch. 58, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 6035, 6037; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 105; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-2991, 89-2992; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4508, 3-4510; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-505, 1-507; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-21-106; Laws 1983, ch. 41, § 1; 1989, ch. 59, § 1; 1996, ch. 43, § 1; 2012, ch. 69, § 1; 2016 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to sale on execution and removal of improvements on real estate upon foreclosure of mechanics' lien, see §

29-3-107

.

As to exemption of seal and register of notary public, see §§

32-1-105

and

32-1-106

.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “four thousand dollars ($4,000.00)” for “two thousand dollars ($2,000.00)” in (a)(iii) and twice in (b); and in (a)(iv), inserted “The value in” and substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” for “in value two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400.00).”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(v).

Construction. —

A debtor could claim an exemption for tools of his trade for property used in a secondary occupation as long as he did not exceed the $2,000 cap. Dunivent v. Bechtoldt, 210 B.R. 599, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 1108 (Bankr. 10th Cir. 1997).

Pursuant to this section, a person can claim up to $2,000 for tools of his trade or business or up to $2,000 for “the library, instruments and implements of any professional person”; the only limitation imposed by the section is the $2,000 cap, so that an individual cannot multiply exemptions by claiming multiple occupations. Dunivent v. Bechtoldt, 210 B.R. 599, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 1108 (Bankr. 10th Cir. 1997).

“Such other household articles,”

as used in this section, refers to the same character of articles included in language immediately preceding it, and a bankrupt's typewriter and phonograph are not exempt. In re Tidball, 40 F.2d 560, 1930 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2049 (D. Wyo. 1930).

Exempted articles to belong to main pursuit. —

Under this section, where a person has two or more separate pursuits, the exempted articles must belong to his main or principal pursuit. In re Edelman's Estate, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1951). But see Dunivent v. Bechtoldt (In re Bechtoldt), 210 B.R. 599, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 1108 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo. 1997), (stating that the language in Edelman regarding primary employment was dicta).

Framed works of art were not pictures.—

Term “pictures”
did not extend to the debtor’s paintings because the term
“pictures”
in the statute applied to those of high
utility or sentimental value
to the debtor and the family, but of
relatively low monetary value
to creditors and the paintings were
framed works of art. Crow v. 2010-1 RADC/CADC Venture, LLC, 2018 WY 139, 430 P.3d 1171,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2018).

Automobile used by taxi driver in his business is exempt

under this section as an implement used in his business. Pellish Bros. v. Cooper, 47 Wyo. 480, 38 P.2d 607,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1934).

Findings of trial court

as to right of exemption under this section and §§

1-20-108

and

20-1-202

, when made on conflicting evidence relative to judgment debtor's being about to remove from state, is conclusive. Wakefield v. Lord, 38 Wyo. 301, 266 P. 1066,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1928).

Vehicle used to commute not exempt. —

When a motor vehicle is: (1) not used directly in the performance of a person's employment duties; and (2) required by a person to commute to his or her sole workplace, the person cannot claim the vehicle as an exemption. Johnston v. Barney, 842 F.2d 1221, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 3781 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988) (decided prior to 1989 amendment).

Finding concerning vehicle not clearly erroneous. —

Where debtors were entitled to exempt certain personal property from their bankruptcy estate, including motor vehicles used in a person's trade or business as of the date of filing, the bankruptcy court's conclusion that a vehicle belonging to the debtors was not property subject to the exemption statute was not clearly erroneous as one debtor was retired on the date of filing of the petition and the other was a homemaker not working outside of the home. Royal v. Pancratz (In re Pancratz), 175 B.R. 85, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17086 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Husband and wife could each claim as exempt $2,000 of tools of trade

under subsection (b) (for a total of $4,000) where both were involved in the same occupation. Coones v. FDIC, 796 P.2d 803,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1990).

Firearms. —

Although debtor was entitled to exemption for pistol he was required to carry as an air force security officer, his practice pistol was not a “tool of the trade” for which he could claim an exemption. Gregory v. Zubrod (In re Gregory), 245 B.R. 171, 2000 Bankr. LEXIS 148 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo.), aff'd, 246 F.3d 681, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 38302 (10th Cir. 2000).

Lien enforced if property voluntarily disposed of. —

A consensual lien encumbering exempt property may still be enforced if the debtor sells, or otherwise attempts to voluntarily transfer, an interest in the property. In re VanGorp, 128 B.R. 579, 1991 Bankr. LEXIS 881 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1991).

Untimely objection to exemption. —

Where Chapter 7 Trustee's objection to the debtors' claimed exemption in their vehicle pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-20-106(a)(iv) (2006) was untimely under Fed. R. Bankr. P. 4003(b), 11 U.S.C.S. § 522(g) could not “save” the Trustee from failing to timely object where the Trustee did not “avoid” the lien. Instead, Trustee's counsel convinced the creditor to release the lien, and by pursuing this course, the Trustee failed to preserve the lien for the estate.
Kuhnel v. Russell (In re Kuhnel), 346 B.R. 528, 2006 Bankr. LEXIS 2007 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2006), rev'd, 495 F.3d 1177,

2007 U.S. App. LEXIS 17672

(10th Cir. 2007).

Stated

in

In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1919); Mitchell v. State, 982 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison With the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Special bank deposits as subject of attachment or garnishment to satisfy depositor's general obligations, 8 ALR4th 998.

§ 1-20-107.
Exemptions when head of family dies.

Whenever the head of
a family dies, deserts, or ceases to reside with the family, the family
is entitled to all the benefits and privileges conferred upon the
head of a family residing with the same, and the family, or any member
thereof, may select the property claimed as exempt. Where the exempt
property is the sole and separate property of the wife, it is, to
the same extent and for all purposes, exempt for the debts of the
wife.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 441; R.S. 1887, § 2789; R.S. 1899, § 3909; C.S. 1910, § 4763; C.S. 1920, § 6036; R.S. 1931, § 89-2993; C.S. 1945, § 3-4509; W.S. 1957, § 1-506; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-21-107.

Applied

in

In re Estate of Edelman, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1951).

Cited

in

Ullman v. Abbott, 10 Wyo. 97, 67 P. 467,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1902); Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1919); In re Arp v. Jacobs, 3 Wyo. 489, 27 P. 800,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1925).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of surviving spouse and children in proceeds of sale of homestead in decedent's estate, 6 ALR2d 515.

§ 1-20-108.
Exception; residency required.

No property claimed as exempt under W.S.

1-20-101

through

1-20-106

is exempt from attachment or sale upon execution for the purchase money of the property.

Any person claiming these exemptions shall be a bona fide resident of this state.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 442; R.S. 1887, § 2790; R.S. 1899, § 3910; C.S. 1910, § 4764; C.S. 1920, § 6037; R.S. 1931, § 89-2992; C.S. 1945, § 3-4510; W.S. 1957, § 1-507; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-21-108.

Exemption presumed established on appeal. —

Evidence not being in the record, supreme court must assume that the facts requisite for a claim of exemption were duly established. Pellish Bros. v. Cooper, 47 Wyo. 480, 38 P.2d 607,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1934).

Nonavailability of provisions to bankrupts. —

See In re Tidball, 40 F.2d 560, 1930 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2049 (D. Wyo. 1930).

Quoted

in

Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

, 40 L.R.A. (n.s.) 785 (1912); Wakefield v. Lord, 38 Wyo. 301, 266 P. 1066,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1928); VanGorp v. Norwest Fin. Wyo., Inc., 128 B.R. 579, 1991 Bankr. LEXIS 881 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1991); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-20-109.
Exemptions
from estates in bankruptcy.

In accordance with 11 U.S.C. § 522(b)(1), the exemptions from property of the estate in bankruptcy
provided in 11 U.S.C. § 522(d) are not authorized in cases where Wyoming law is applicable
on the date of the filing of the petition and the debtor’s domicile
has been located in Wyoming for the one hundred eighty (180) days
immediately preceding the date of the filing of the petition or for
a longer portion of the one hundred eighty (180) day period than in
any other place.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 8, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “section 522(b)(2) of the Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978” following “In accordance with.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Applicability of state law. —

To the extent that a Wyoming debtor meets the domicile requirement of 11 USCS § 522(b)(2)(A), he claims his homestead exemptions under Wyoming law. In re Johnson, 184 B.R. 141, 1995 Bankr. LEXIS 973 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1995)(decided prior to 2004 amendment).

Applied

in

Dunivent v. Bechtoldt, 210 B.R. 599, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 1108 (Bankr. 10th Cir. 1997); Evans v. Royal (In re Evans), — F. Supp. 2d —, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21893 (D. Wyo. Jan. 11, 2000).

Stated

in

In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985); Michaels v. Zubrod, 282 B.R. 234, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 896 (10th Cir. 2002).

Cited

in

Johnston v. Barney, 842 F.2d 1221,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 3781

(10th Cir. 1988); In re Welty, 217 B.R. 907, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 92 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1998); Gregory v. Zubrod, 245 B.R. 171, 2000 Bankr. LEXIS 148 (10th Cir. 2000); Zubrod v. Winters, 2002 WY 29, 40 P.3d 1231,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2002); Royal v. Baker, 273 B.R. 892, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 130 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 2002); Duncan v. Zubrod (In re Duncan), 294 B.R. 339, 2003 Bankr. LEXIS 594 (10th Cir. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conditioning reinstatement of attorney upon reaffirmation of debt discharged in bankruptcy, 39 ALR4th 586.

Right of debtor to “de-acceleration” of residential mortgage indebtedness
under chapter 13 of the Bankruptcy Code of 1978 (11 USC § 1322(b)),
67 ALR Fed 217.

Debts for alimony, maintenance, and support as exceptions to bankruptcy
discharge, under §
523(a)(5) of Bankruptcy Code of 1978 (11 USC § 523(a)(5)),
69 ALR Fed 403.

When does medical practitioner's treatment of patient constitute
“willful and malicious injury,” so as to make practitioner's debt
arising from such treatment nondischargeable under § 523(a)(6) of
Bankruptcy Act (11 USC § 523(a)(6)),
77 ALR Fed 918.

Individual retirement accounts as exempt property in bankruptcy, 133 ALR Fed 1.

Creditor's right to have bankruptcy discharge of individual debtor revoked, vacated, and set aside, 138 ALR Fed 253.

What constitutes “disposable income” under §
1325(b) of Bankruptcy Code of 1978 (11 USC § 1325(b)), providing that all disposable income for specified
period must be applied to plan for payment of creditors,
138 ALR Fed 547.

Debts arising from penalties as exceptions to bankruptcy discharge
under §§ 523(a)(7), (13) and
1328(a) of Bankruptcy Code of 1978 (11 U.S.C. §§ 523 (a)(7), (13), and 1328(a)),
150 ALR Fed 159.